dictsource/jbo_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded 
// Spelling to phoneme rules for Lojban (an artificial constructed language).

// Note: initial/final "." has already been removed

.group a
	a	a
	ai	aI
	au	aU
     X) a (_	,a	// single-syllable cmavo are unstressed
     X) ai (_	,aI
     X) au (_	,aU

.group b
	b	b
	b (C	b_

.group c
	c	S
     K) c (C    S_!

.group d
	d	d
	dj	dZ  // ??

.group e
	e	e
	ei	eI
     X) e (_	,e
     X) ei (_	,eI

.group f
	f	f

.group g
	g	g

     _) gi ('A_  _;_gi

.group h
	h	h

.group i
	i	i
	i (A	j
     X) i (_	,i
     X) i (A_	,j

.group j
	j	Z

.group k
	k	k

.group l
	l	l-  // syllabic
     A) l       l
	l (A    l

.group m
	m	m

.group n
	n	n-   // syllabic
     A) n       n
        n (A    n
	n (g	N
	n (k	N

.group o
	o	o
	oi	oI
     X) o (_	,o
     X) oi (_	,oI

.group p
	p	p

.group q
	q	kw

.group r
	r	r-  // syllabic
     A) r	R
	r (A	R
	r (C	R_   // ?? do this in phonemes data instead?


.group s
	s	s

.group t
	t	t
	tc	tS

.group u
	u	u
	u (A	w
     X) u (_	,u
     X) u (A_	,w

.group v
	v	v

.group w
	w	w

.group x
	x	x

.group y
	y 	@

.group z
	z	z

.group
	'	h
     _) ' (_    '@h@

	D) . (D	||p%i||,	// decimal point
	.	_!	// dot
     _)	. (@P1	_!      // remove . prefix
	. (_S1  _!	// remove . suffix


	ˈ	'       // U+2c8  stress marker (from syllable capitalisation)
